Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-803
Terms, defined.

The terms trustees of any cemetery or the trustees, as used in sections 12-801 to 12-804, shall include trustees of a cemetery association, cemetery boards, or other persons, public or private corporations, municipalities, townships, boards or governing bodies having the management or control of a cemetery or cemeteries in this state. The term lot, as used in sections 12-801 to 12-804, shall include part or all of one or more lots owned of record by the same person or persons.

Laws 1945, c. 15, § 3, p. 116.